Florida, session 2026, HB329.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (136) is added to section 320.08058,
Florida Statutes, to read:
320.08058 Specialty license plates.—
(136) MIAMI NORTHWESTERN ALUMNI ASSOCIATION LICENSE
PLATES.—
(a) The department shall develop a Miami Northwestern
Alumni Association license plate as provided in this section and
s. 320.08053. The plate must bear the colors and design approved
by the department. The word "Florida" must appear at the top of
the plate, and the words "Miami Northwestern Alumni Association"
must appear at the bottom of the plate.
(b) The annual use fees from the sale of the plate must be
distributed to the Miami Northwestern Alumni Association, Inc.,
and used to fund need-based scholarships, academic programs, and
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb329-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 329 2026
athletic programs for the benefit of Miami Northwestern Senior
High School students and the Miami Northwestern Senior High
School Performing and Visual Arts Center.
Section 2. This act shall take effect October 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb329-00